Illinois, session 104th, HB3622.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Grant Accountability and Transparency Act 5is amended by changing Section 65 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 708/65)7    Sec. 65. Audit requirements. 8    (a) The standards set forth in Subpart F of 2 CFR 200 and 9any other standards that apply directly to State or federal 10agencies shall apply to audits of fiscal years beginning on or 11after December 26, 2014.12    (b) Books and records must be available for review or 13audit by appropriate officials of the pass-through entity, and 14the agency, the Auditor General, the Inspector General, 15appropriate officials of the agency, and the federal 16Government Accountability Office.17    (c) The Governor's Office of Management and Budget, with 18the advice and technical assistance of the Illinois Single 19Audit Commission, shall adopt rules for audits of grants from 20a State or federal pass-through entity that are not subject to 21the Single Audit Act because the amount of the federal award is 22less than $750,000 or the subrecipient is an exempt entity and 23that are reasonably consistent with 2 CFR 200.  HB3622- 2 -LRB104 11210 HLH 21292 b1    (d) This Act does not affect the provisions of the 2Illinois State Auditing Act and does not address the external 3audit function of the Auditor General.4    (e) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the 5contrary, all subcontractors and subrecipients who receive 6State grants, whether directly or indirectly, are subject to 7the provisions of this Act, including auditing by the Auditor 8General and the transparency provisions of this Act. 9(Source: P.A. 98-706, eff. 7-16-14.)